North Dakota, session 69, HB1562.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 15.1-07-34 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
15.1-07-34. Youth behavioral health and child abuse and neglect training tofor teachers,
administrators, and ancillary staff.
1. Every two years, eacha school district may provide a minimum of eight hours of professional
development on youth behavioral health, child abuse, and child neglect to elementary, middle,
and high school teachers, and administrators. EachA school district may encourage ancillary
and support staff to participate in the professional development. Based on the annual needs
assessment of the school district, these hours may be designated from the following
categories:
a. Trauma;
b. Social and emotional learning, including resiliency;
c. Suicide prevention;
d. Bullying;
e. Understanding of the prevalence and impact of youth behavioral health wellness on
family structure, education, juvenile services, law enforcement, and health care and
treatment providers;
f. Knowledge of behavioral health symptoms, and risks;
g. Awareness of referral sources and evidence-based strategies for appropriate
interventions;
h. Child protective services;
i. Other evidence-based strategies to reduce risk factors for students; or
i.j. Current or new evidence-based behavior prevention or mitigation techniques.
2. Each school within a district shall designate an individual as a behavioral health resource
coordinator.
3. The superintendent of public instruction shall collaborate with regional education associations
to disseminate information, training and instructional materials, and notice of training
opportunities to school districts and nonpublic schools. ThisThe training must qualify for
continuing education credits that count toward license renewal.

H. B. NO. 1562 - PAGE 2
4. The superintendent of public instruction shall maintain the contact information of the
behavioral health resource coordinator in each school.
5. Before initial licensure, a public or nonpublic school teacher, administrator, librarian, and
counselor shall submit documentation to the education standards and practices board
verifying completion of a mandated reporter training program for suspected child abuse or
neglect. The department of health and human services shall develop and provide an online
interactive training module that may be used by a college of teacher education, an individual
educator, and an educational institution to fulfill the training requirement. A college, school,
and regional education association may offer a mandated reporter training program that
satisfy the requirements outlined in this section for subsequent trainings at the district level.
SECTION 2. REPEAL. Section 15.1-19-29 of the North Dakota Century Code is repealed.

H. B. NO. 1562 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1562.
House Vote: Yeas 90 Nays 1 Absent 3
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State